Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 8
GRADES OF QUALITY FOR MILK AND MILK PRODUCTS

Sec.

§ 37-801. Use of grade terms restricted. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-802. Licenses. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-803. Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-804. Revocation of licenses. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-805. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-806. Penalty for violations

Injunctions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-807. Separability. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-808. Policy to improve dairy quality requirements. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-809. Adoption of federal standards for certain dairy products. [Repealed.]

§ 37-810. Administration of act

Publication of grade standards. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-811. Compliance with naming and grading regulations required. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 284, § 3, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 37-812. Violations of law misdemeanor. [Repealed.]

§ 37-813. Rules and regulations

Effect. [Repealed.]